Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1595.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 5, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-501.02, to read: START_STATUTE15-501.02. Teachers; lunch break; requirements; exception A. Each public school in this state shall provide each certificated teacher who is a full-time employee of the public school, including indirect employment through a third-party contractor, with a daily lunch break that meets all of the following requirements: 1. Is at least thirty consecutive minutes. 2. Is not included in any daily planning period or noninstructional time. 3. Is scheduled during the teacher's regular workday. B. A public school may not: 1. Increase the hours of work for a teacher's regular workday because the public school provides lunch breaks pursuant to this section. 2. Assign, request or otherwise require that a teacher perform any official duties, including any supervisory or instructional duty, during the lunch break that the public school provides to the teacher pursuant to this section. C. Notwithstanding subsection B, paragraph 2 of this section, if a public school has an emergency personnel shortage, the public school may assign official duties to a certificated teacher during the teacher's lunch break for not more than one day per week. An assignment pursuant to this subsection must be temporary. END_STATUTE